Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2365.02
Funds of state or political subdivisions; investment in certificates of deposit and timed deposits; conditions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, to the extent that the funds of this state or any political subdivision of this state may be invested, by the appropriate custodian of such funds, in certificates of deposit or time deposits with banks, capital stock financial institutions, or qualifying mutual financial institutions, such authorization shall include the investment of funds in certificates of deposit and time deposits in accordance with the following conditions:

(1) The bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution in this state through which the investment of funds is initially made arranges for the deposit of a portion or all of such funds in one or more certificates of deposit or time deposits with other banks, capital stock financial institutions, or qualifying mutual financial institutions located in the United States;

(2) Each such certificate of deposit or time deposit is fully insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation;

(3) The bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution through which the investment of funds was initially made acts as a custodian for the state or political subdivision with respect to any such certificate of deposit or time deposit issued for the account of the state or political subdivision; and

(4) At the same time that the funds are deposited into and such certificates of deposit or time deposits are issued by other banks, capital stock financial institutions, or qualifying mutual financial institutions, the bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution through which the investment of funds in certificates of deposit or time deposits was initially made receives an amount of deposits from customers of other banks, capital stock financial institutions, or qualifying mutual financial institutions located in the United States which is equal to or greater than the amount of the investment of funds in certificates of deposit or time deposits initially made by the state or political subdivision.

Laws 2004, LB 999, § 51;

Laws 2009, LB259, § 23.
March 6, 2009
Public Funds Deposit Security Act, see section 77-2386.